Utah statutes.
39-4-3.   Compensation of force members.
(1)  Every member of the Utah State Defense Force, when called into active
service by the governor shall receive compensation as prescribed by the
governor.
(2)  The compensation may not exceed the rate of pay under law for officers
and other members of the National Guard when called into active service of the
state by the governor.
